Hawaii statutes.
§507D-5 Requirement of certified court
order. (a) Any claim of lien against a federal, state, or county officer
or employee based on the performance or nonperformance of that officer's or
employee's duties shall designate in the pleading header that the claim is
directed to a federal, state, or county officer or employee, and shall be
invalid unless accompanied by a certified order from a state or federal court
of competent jurisdiction authorizing the filing of such lien.

(b) Any claim of nonconsensual common law lien
against a private party in interest shall be invalid unless accompanied by a
certified order from a state or federal court of competent jurisdiction
authorizing the filing of nonconsensual common law lien.

(c) The registrar shall not accept for filing
a claim for nonconsensual common law lien unless the claim is accompanied by a
certified state or federal court order authorizing the filing of the lien. [L
1996, c 24, pt of §1; am L 2000, c 95, §1; am L 2001, c 96, §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next